Washington statutes.
RCW 36.115.060

Procedure for establishment—Counties affected.

(1) The county legislative authority of every county with a population of one hundred fifty thousand or more shall convene a meeting on or before March 1, 1995, to develop a process for the establishment of service agreements. Invitations to attend this meeting shall be sent to the governing body of each city located in the county, and to the governing body of each special district located in the county that provides one or more of the governmental services as defined in RCW 36.115.020(2).

The legislative authorities of counties of less than one hundred fifty thousand population may utilize this chapter by adopting a resolution stating their intent to do so. In that case or in the case of counties whose populations reach one hundred fifty thousand after March 1, 1995, this meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the county adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management as having a population of one hundred fifty thousand or more.

(2) On or before January 1, 1997, a service agreement must be adopted in each county under this chapter or a progress report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(3) In other counties that choose to utilize this chapter or whose population reaches one hundred fifty thousand, the service agreement must be adopted two years after the initial meeting provided for in subsection (1) of this section is convened or a progress report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

[ 1994 c 266 s 6.]